Utah statutes.
13-14-206.   Site-control agreements.
(1)  A site-control agreement entered into on or after May 11, 2010:
(a)  may be voluntarily terminated by a franchisee, subject to Subsection
(2)(a); and
(b)  terminates immediately upon:
(i)  a franchisor's sale, assignment, or other transfer of the right to
manufacture or distribute the line-make of vehicles covered by the
franchisee's franchise;
(ii)  a franchisor's ceasing to manufacture or distribute the line-make of
vehicles covered by the franchisee's franchise;
(iii)  a franchisor's termination of a franchisee's franchise without cause
and against the franchisee's will; or
(iv)  the failure of the franchisor or its affiliate to exercise a right of
first refusal to purchase the assets or ownership of the franchisee's business
when given the opportunity to do so under the franchise or other agreement,
subject to the repayment requirements of Subsection (2) if the right of first
refusal arises because of the voluntary action of the franchisee.
(2) (a)  If a franchisee voluntarily terminates a site-control agreement after
the franchisor has paid and the franchisee or other recipient has accepted
additional specified cash consideration, the site-control agreement remains
valid only until the franchisee or other recipient satisfies the repayment
terms specified in Subsection (2)(b).
(b) (i)  If the franchisor's additional specified cash consideration was used
for the construction of a building or improvement on the property that is the
subject of the site-control agreement, the amount of the repayment under
Subsection (2)(a):
(A)  is based on any repayment terms specified in the site-control agreement,
if the parties to the site-control agreement have willingly agreed to the
terms; and
(B)  may not exceed the market value of the portion of the building or
improvement constructed with the additional specified cash consideration paid
by the franchisor, after allowing for depreciation based on a market-based
depreciation schedule, as determined by an independent appraiser at the
request of the franchisee or other recipient.
(ii)  If the franchisor's additional specified cash consideration was not used
for construction of a building or improvement on the property that is the
subject of the site-control agreement, the amount of the repayment under
Subsection (2)(a) is an equitable portion of the cash consideration, as
determined under any terms specified in the site-control agreement for the
equitable repayment following a franchisee's voluntary termination of the
agreement.
(c)  Immediately upon the repayment under Subsection (2)(b):
(i)  the site-control agreement is terminated; and
(ii)  the franchisor or other party that is the beneficiary under the site-
control agreement shall prepare and deliver to the franchisee a recordable
notice of termination of:
(A)  the site-control agreement; and
(B)  any lien or encumbrance arising because of the site-control agreement and
previously recorded against the property that is the subject of the site-
control agreement.
